Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201852-2106
Lien; period of enforceability.

(1) Except as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a lien that has become
enforceable as provided in section 52-2103 shall continue to be enforceable
for two years after the recording of the lien.

(2) Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, if an owner, holder of a security
interest, mortgage, or trust deed, or other person having an interest in the
commercial real estate gives the commercial real estate broker written demand
to institute a judicial proceeding within thirty days, the lien lapses unless,
within thirty days after receipt of the written demand, the commercial real
estate broker institutes judicial proceedings.

(3) If a judicial proceeding
to enforce a lien is instituted while a lien is effective under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, the lien continues during the pendency of the
proceeding.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 12.